Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 58 Falsifying Educational Records

11-58-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter shall be to:

Prohibit forgery, counterfeiting, or alteration of a transcript, diploma, or grade report of a postsecondary educational institution;

Prohibit certain uses of a forged, counterfeit, or altered transcript, diploma, or grade report, including, but not limited to, obtaining employment or any license; and

Provide a certain penalty for violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 185, § 1.

11-58-2.
Uses prohibited.

A person shall not falsely make, forge, counterfeit, or cause or procure to be falsely made, forged, or counterfeited, or willingly aid or assist in falsely making, forging, or counterfeiting a transcript, diploma, or grade report of a postsecondary educational institution.

A person shall not use, offer, or present as genuine a false, forged, counterfeited, or altered transcript, diploma, or grade report of a postsecondary educational institution.

A person shall not use, offer, or present a transcript, diploma, or grade report of a postsecondary educational institution in a fraudulent manner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 185, § 1.

11-58-3.
Penalties for violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be subject to a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or shall be imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 185, § 1.